Wyoming, session 2025, SF0046.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 41-7-412, 41-7-813 and
41-10-113(a)(xi) are amended to read:
41-7-412. Advertisement for bids.
In all cases where the work to be done at any one (1) time
under the direction of the commissioners will, in their
opinion, cost to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars
($7,500.00) seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00), the
same shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, and the
commissioner shall advertise for sealed bids, by notice
published in some newspaper published in the county in
which the petition is filed, and may advertise in one (1)
or more newspapers published elsewhere. If there be no
newspaper published in the county in which the petition is
filed, they shall advertise in some newspaper published in
an adjoining county, which said notice shall particularly
set forth the time and place when and where the bids
advertised will be opened, the kind of work to be let and
the terms of payment. Said commissioners may continue the
letting from time to time, if in their judgment the same
shall be necessary, and shall reserve the right to reject
any and all bids. This section shall not be construed to
apply to the employment of superintendent, engineer,
attorney or other employee engaged in the general work of
the district.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0046
ENROLLED ACT NO. 54, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
41-7-813. Construction of irrigation works; cost
estimates; advertisement for bids; contracts.
Before any district shall enter into any contract for the
construction, building, alteration, extension, or
improvement of any irrigation works, power plant or system,
or any part or section thereof for the use of the district,
or for the purchase of any materials, machinery, or
apparatus, such district shall cause estimates of the cost
thereof to be made by some competent engineer or engineers
and if such estimated cost shall exceed the sum of one
thousand dollars ($1,000.00) twenty thousand dollars
($20,000.00) no such contract shall be entered into for a
price, cost or consideration exceeding such estimate nor
without advertising for sealed bids. Prior to such
advertisement, plans and specifications for the proposed
construction work or materials shall be prepared and filed
at the principal office or place of business of the
district. Such advertisement shall be inserted for three
(3) consecutive issues, with not less than twenty (20) days
intervening between the first and last publication dates,
in one (1) or more newspapers of general circulation in the
district and, in the discretion of the board of directors
of the district, in such additional newspapers or trade or
technical periodicals as may be selected by the board in
order to give proper notice of the receiving of bids. Such
advertisement shall designate the nature of the
construction work proposed to be done or materials proposed
to be purchased; that the plans and specifications therefor
may be inspected at the office of the district, giving the
location thereof, and shall designate the time within which
bids shall be filed and the date, hour and place the same
shall be opened. The board of directors of the district,
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0046
ENROLLED ACT NO. 54, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
with the assistance of the state engineer, whose duty it
shall be to supervise such lettings, may let the contract
for such work or materials to the lowest responsible
bidder, or, in the sole discretion of the board, all bids
tendered may be rejected and readvertisement for bids made
in the manner, form and time in this section provided. No
such contract shall be valid nor shall any money of the
district be expended thereunder unless advertisement and
letting shall have been had as in this section provided.
Such contract shall provide that wherever possible workmen
who are citizens of Wyoming shall be employed by the
contractor. All provisions of W.S. 16-6-112 through
16-6-115, with reference to contractor's bonds, shall be
applicable and effective as to any contract let pursuant to
the provisions of this act; provided further, that if all
or a portion of the cost of the proposed works is to be met
by grant of labor or a grant in aid from a federal or state
agency, the rules and regulations of which agency provide
that work shall not be done by contract, the board may
proceed with the necessary construction or other work
without first complying with any of the foregoing
provisions of this section.
41-10-113. Powers of district board.
(a) For and on behalf of the district the board of
any district shall have the following powers:
(xi) Except as otherwise provided in this act,
to enter into contracts and agreements affecting the
affairs of the district, including but not limited to
contracts with the United States of America and any of its
agencies or instrumentalities, and contracts with any
municipality or district for the operation of a common or
jointly owned project. Any improvement or improvements of
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0046
ENROLLED ACT NO. 54, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
any nature made in any district where the entire cost,
value or amount of such work including labor and materials
shall exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00)
seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00), except such
work done by employees of the district with supplies and
materials purchased by it as hereinafter provided or except
by labor or supplies and materials, or all of such,
supplied under agreement with the United States of America,
the state of Wyoming, or any federal or state agency,
instrumentality or corporation, or other political
subdivision, shall be done only under independent contract
to be entered into by the district with the lowest
responsible bidder submitting the lowest and best bid upon
proper terms after due public notice by publication has
been given asking for competitive bids. The district shall
have the right to reject any and all bids and to waive any
irregularity in any bid. Any contract may be let on a lump
sum or unit basis. No contract shall be entered into for
such work unless the contractor shall give an undertaking
with a sufficient surety or sureties approved by the board
and in an amount fixed by the board for the faithful
performance of the contract. Upon default in the
performance of any contract, the proper official may
advertise and relet the remainder of the work without
further resolution and deduct the cost from the original
contract price and recover any excess cost by suit on the
original bond, or otherwise. The district shall have the
power to make any improvement, or portion thereof, in any
district, directly by the officers, agents and employees of
the district, with supplies and materials purchased or
otherwise acquired therefor. All supplies, materials,
equipment, machinery and apparatus purchased by the board
for any district (but not by a contractor) costing thirty
thousand dollars ($30,000.00) seventy-five thousand dollars
($75,000.00) or more shall be purchased only after notice
4

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0046
ENROLLED ACT NO. 54, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
by publication for competitive bids. The district shall
accept the lowest bid, kind, quality and material being
equal, but the district shall have the right to reject any
and all bids, to waive any irregularity in any bid, and to
select a single item from any bid. The provision as to
bidding requirements of this paragraph shall not apply to
the purchase of patented and manufactured products offered
for sale in a noncompetitive market or solely by a
manufacturer's authorized dealer;
Section 2. This act shall apply to any improvement or
purchase of a water, irrigation, sewer or water and sewer
district initiated on or after July 1, 2025.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0046
ENROLLED ACT NO. 54, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
6